District of Columbia statutes.
51-132

Supporting evidence required to support payment of benefits due to domestic violence.

A claimant may be eligible to receive benefits for separation from employment due to domestic violence provided that one of the following is submitted to support the claim of domestic violence:

(1)

A police report or record;

(2)

A governmental agency or court record, such as a court order, a Petition for a Civil Protection Order, or a record or report from Child Services; or

(3)

A written statement, which affirms that the claimant has sought assistance for domestic violence from the signatory, from a:

(i)

Shelter official;

(ii)

Social worker;

(iii)

Counselor;

(iv)

Therapist;

(v)

Attorney;

(vi)

Medical doctor; or

(vii)

Cleric.

Aug. 28, 1935, ch. 794, § 32
as added June 19, 2004, D.C. Law 15-171, § 2(b), 51 DCR 4701